Louisiana, session 2026, HB1219.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 2-E of Code Title XII of Code Book III of Title 9 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 9:3580.21 through R.S. 9:3580.25, is hereby
enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 2-E. CONSUMER LAWSUIT FUNDING ACT
§3580.21. Legislative purpose; construction
A. The purpose of this Chapter is to do all of the following:
(1) Protect consumers who enter into litigation funding transactions from
excessive charges, unfair practices, and lack of transparency.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-333 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1219
(2) Ensure that consumer lawsuit funding transactions are subject to
reasonable limits on rates of return consistent with the law of this state governing
extensions of credit.
(3) Promote full, fair, and conspicuous disclosure of the terms, costs, and
effective rates of return so that consumers may make informed financial decisions.
(4) Preserve the integrity of the attorney-client relationship and ensure that
third-party funding arrangements do not interfere with the control or resolution of
legal claims.
(5) Prevent the use of litigation funding arrangements to circumvent the
usury laws and consumer protection statutes of this state.
(6) Prohibit deceptive, misleading, abusive, or unfair practices in connection
with consumer lawsuit funding transactions, including practices that obscure the true
cost or impact of such transactions on a consumer's recovery.
B. This Chapter shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purpose of
protecting consumers who engage in lawsuit funding transactions and to ensure
transparency and fairness in such agreements.
§3580.22. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following words have the following meanings:
(1) "Consumer" means an individual who is or may become a plaintiff,
claimant, or adverse party in a dispute, whether in a judicial, administrative, or
alternative dispute resolution proceeding.
(2) "Consumer lawsuit funder" means any person or entity that engages in
consumer lawsuit funding.
(3) "Consumer lawsuit funding" means any of the following:
(a) Providing money or a thing of value to a consumer in connection with a
dispute, the repayment of which is conditioned upon and sourced from all or a
portion of the consumer's proceeds from the resolution of the dispute by judgment,
settlement, award, or otherwise.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-333 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1219
(b) Purchasing from a consumer the right to receive all or a portion of the
proceeds of that consumer's dispute by judgment, settlement, award, or otherwise.
(4) "Dispute" means any of the following:
(a) Any civil action pending in a court of this state.
(b) Any administrative adjudication or hearing before a state or local
government agency.
(c) Any arbitration, mediation, or other alternative dispute resolution
proceeding pursuant to written agreement of the parties.
§3580.23. Maximum lawful rate of return in consumer lawsuit funding
A. A consumer lawsuit funder shall not collect from a consumer in a
consumer lawsuit funding transaction a percentage rate of return exceeding the
maximum conventional interest rate percentage allowable pursuant to R.S. 9:3500.
B. Any amount paid or payable to a consumer lawsuit funder under a
consumer lawsuit funding transaction that exceeds the amount advanced to, provided
to, or purchased from the consumer shall be considered for the purposes of
calculating the percentage rate of return for the purposes of this Chapter.
§3580.24. Contract requirements and disclosures
A. A consumer lawsuit funding agreement shall be in writing, signed by both
the consumer and the consumer lawsuit funder, and shall clearly set forth the terms
of the transaction, including all of the following:
(1) The total amount to be advanced to, provided to, or purchased from the
consumer.
(2) An itemized calculation of all fees, charges, or other amounts due to the
consumer lawsuit funder.
(3) The method by which the consumer lawsuit funder will be repaid from
proceeds of a settlement, judgment, award, or other resolution.
(4) A conspicuous written disclosure that the agreement may affect the
consumer's net recovery from the dispute.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-333 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1219
B. The annual percentage rate applicable to the consumer lawsuit funding
transaction, if any, shall be clearly and conspicuously disclosed in bold typeface not
smaller than twelve-point font on the first page of the contract.
§3580.25. Prohibited practices
A consumer lawsuit funder shall not do any of the following:
(1) Charge, contract for, or receive an effective rate of return that exceeds
the lawful maximum as provided by R.S. 9:3580.22.
(2) Misrepresent the terms of a consumer lawsuit funding agreement or the
effect of a consumer lawsuit funding transaction on the consumer's rights or
recovery.
(3) Require a consumer to waive any substantive rights or remedies available
under law.
§3580.26. Exemptions
The provisions of this Chapter do not apply to any of the following:
(1) Any agreement, advance, loan, or other extension of credit made to or on
behalf of an attorney or law firm, including but not limited to any of the following:
(a) Loans, lines of credit, or other financing provided for the operation of a
law practice.
(b) Contingent fee agreements between an attorney and client governed by
the Rules of Professional Conduct.
(c) Any advance of costs or expenses by an attorney in connection with the
representation of a client.
(2) Any agreement or arrangement for the provision of medical care,
treatment, or services to a consumer, including but not limited to any of the
following:
(a) Medical liens, privileges, or assignments recognized pursuant to the law
of this state.
(b) Agreements for payment of healthcare services contingent upon the
outcome of a dispute.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-333 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1219
(c) Third-party financing or payment arrangements for medical treatment,
provided that such arrangements are made primarily for the purpose of delivering
healthcare services and not for the purchase of an interest in litigation proceeds.
§3580.27. Enforcement; remedies
A. A violation of any provision of this Chapter shall constitute an unfair
trade practice pursuant to the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law,
R.S. 51:1401 et seq.
B. A consumer whose rights pursuant to this Chapter have been violated may
bring a civil action to recover all of the following:
(1) Actual damages.
(2) Reasonable attorney fees and costs.
(3) Any other remedy available under law.
C. The attorney general may bring suit to enforce this Chapter and seek
injunctive or other relief to prevent or restrain violations.